Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Subpart 2 County Board of Elections and County Board of Elections and Registration

21-2-40.
General Assembly authorized to create board of elections and board of elections and registration in any county.

The General Assembly may by local Act create a board of elections in any county of this state and empower the board with the powers and duties of the election superintendent relating to the conduct of primaries and elections. Such board shall consist of not fewer than three members.

The General Assembly may by local Act create a board of elections and registration in any county of this state and empower the board with the powers and duties of the election superintendent relating to the conduct of primaries and elections and with the powers and duties of the board of registrars relating to the registration of voters and absentee-balloting procedures. Such board shall consist of not fewer than three members.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1292, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 261, § 1/SB 456; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 2/SB 92.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).